Arkansas, session 2025, HB1306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-120-501, concerning definitions related
to charitable immunity for a church or other place of worship, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) "Volunteer security person" means a person who provides
safety, security, or protection for a church or other place of worship as
authorized by the church or other place of worship to benefit persons in
attendance at a meeting or other gathering held at or sponsored by the church
or other place of worship without any express or implied promise of
remuneration.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 120, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-120-506. Civil immunity for volunteer security personnel.
*CEB085*
03-13-2025 10:39:16 CEB085

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1306
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, the
following are not subject to civil liability for damages, injury, or death
resulting from or arising out of a negligent act or omission by a volunteer
security person who is providing safety, security, or protection services for
a church or other place of worship:
(1) The volunteer security person providing the safety,
security, or protection services; and
(2) The church or other place of worship for which the volunteer
security person is providing safety, security, or protection services.
(b) A church or other place of worship or a volunteer security person
is entitled to civil immunity under this section if the:
(1) Church or other place of worship requires adequate training
in the provision of safety, security, or protection services for a person to
become a volunteer security person; and
(2) Volunteer security person has received the training required
by the church or other place of worship.
(c) The civil immunity provided by this section includes without
limitation civil immunity for the use of nonlethal or lethal force in
providing safety, security, or protection services.
(d) The civil immunity provided by this section does not apply to or
include an act or omission that arises out of intentional, reckless, or
grossly negligent conduct.

/s/Furman












03-13-2025 10:39:16 CEB085